New York, session 2025-2026, S2137.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 71-3707 to read as follows: 3 § 71-3707. Failure to report release of hazardous substances. 4 Any person who violates any of the provisions of, or who fails to 5 perform any duty imposed by section 37-0107 of this chapter, and who 6 fails to notify the department of a release of a reportable quantity of 7 a hazardous substance that is hazardous or acutely hazardous to public 8 health, safety or the environment shall be guilty of failure to report 9 release of a hazardous substance. Failure to report release of a hazard- 10 ous substance shall be a class A misdemeanor; provided, however, that if 11 a defendant has previously been convicted of a violation of this 12 section, such subsequent violation shall be a class E felony. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of December next succeed- 14 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05616-01-5